California, session 20252026, SB381.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code is amended to read:1798.24. An agency shall not disclose personal information in a manner that would link the information disclosed to the individual to whom it pertains unless the information is disclosed, as follows:(a) To the individual to whom the information pertains.(b) With the prior written voluntary consent of the individual to whom the information pertains, but only if that consent has been obtained not more than 30 days before the disclosure, or in the time limit agreed to by the individual in the written consent.(c) To the duly appointed guardian or conservator of the individual or a person representing the individual if it can be proven with reasonable certainty through the possession of agency forms, documents, or correspondence that this person is the authorized representative of the individual to whom the information pertains.(d) To those officers, employees, attorneys, agents, or volunteers of the agency that have custody of the information if the disclosure is relevant and necessary in the ordinary course of the performance of their official duties and is related to the purpose for which the information was acquired.(e) To a person, or to another agency if the transfer is necessary for the transferee agency to perform its constitutional or statutory duties, and the use is compatible with a purpose for which the information was collected and the use or transfer is in accordance with Section 1798.25. With respect to information transferred from a law enforcement or regulatory agency, or information transferred to another law enforcement or regulatory agency, a use is compatible if the use of the information requested is needed in an investigation of unlawful activity under the jurisdiction of the requesting agency or for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes by that agency.(f) To a governmental entity if required by state or federal law.(g) Under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).(h) To a person who has provided the agency with advance, adequate written assurance that the information will be used solely for statistical research or reporting purposes, but only if the information to be disclosed is in a form that will not identify an individual.(i) Pursuant to a determination by the agency that maintains information that compelling circumstances exist that affect the health or safety of an individual, if upon the disclosure notification is transmitted to the individual to whom the information pertains at the individual’s last known address. Disclosure shall not be made if it is in conflict with other state or federal laws.(j) To the State Archives as a record that has sufficient historical or other value to warrant its continued preservation by the California state government, or for evaluation by the Director of General Services or the director’s designee to determine whether the record has further administrative, legal, or fiscal value.(k) To a person pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process if, before the disclosure, the agency reasonably attempts to notify the individual to whom the record pertains, and if the notification is not prohibited by law.(l) To a person pursuant to a search warrant.(m) Pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2 of the Vehicle Code.(n) For the sole purpose of verifying and paying government health care service claims made pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(o) To a law enforcement or regulatory agency when required for an investigation of unlawful activity or for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes, unless the disclosure is otherwise prohibited by law.(p) To another person or governmental organization to the extent necessary to obtain information from the person or governmental organization for an investigation by the agency of a failure to comply with a specific state law that the agency is responsible for enforcing.(q) To an adopted person and disclosure is limited to general background information pertaining to the adopted person’s biological parents, if the information does not include or reveal the identity of the biological parents.(r) Beginning on July 1, 2028, to an adopted person, or descendant of a deceased adopted person, as defined in Section 6205 of the Probate Code, limited to the adopted person’s original birth certificate retrieved as prescribed in Section 102705 of the Health and Safety Code.(s) To a child or a grandchild of an adopted person and disclosure is limited to medically necessary information pertaining to the adopted person’s biological parents. However, the information, or the process for obtaining the information, shall not include or reveal the identity of the biological parents. The State Department of Social Services shall adopt regulations governing the release of information pursuant to this subdivision. The regulations shall require licensed adoption agencies to provide the same services provided by the department as established by this subdivision.(t) To a committee of the Legislature or to a Member of the Legislature, or the member’s staff if authorized in writing by the member, if the member has permission to obtain the information from the individual to whom it pertains or if the member provides reasonable assurance that the member is acting on behalf of the individual.(u) (1) To the University of California, a nonprofit educational institution, an established nonprofit research institution performing health or social services research, the Cradle-to-Career Data System, for purposes consistent with the creation and execution of the Cradle-to-Career Data System Act pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 10860) of Chapter 8.5 of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, or, in the case of education-related data, another nonprofit entity, conducting scientific research, if the request for information is approved by the Committee for the Protection of Human Subjects (CPHS) for the California Health and Human Services Agency (CHHSA) or an institutional review board, as authorized in paragraphs (5) and (6). The approval shall include a review and determination that all the following criteria have been satisfied:(A) The researcher has provided a plan sufficient to protect personal information from improper use and disclosures, including sufficient administrative, physical, and technical safeguards to protect personal information from reasonable anticipated threats to the security or confidentiality of the information.(B) The researcher has provided a sufficient plan to destroy or return all personal information as soon as it is no longer needed for the research project, unless the researcher has demonstrated an ongoing need for the personal information for the research project and has provided a long-term plan sufficient to protect the confidentiality of that information.(C) The researcher has provided sufficient written assurances that the personal information will not be reused or disclosed to any other person or entity, or used in any manner, not approved in the research protocol, except as required by law or for authorized oversight of the research project.(2) The CPHS shall enter into a written agreement with the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data, as defined in Section 10862 of the Education Code, to assist the managing entity of that office in its role as the institutional review board for the Cradle-to-Career Data System.(3) The CPHS or institutional review board shall, at a minimum, accomplish all of the following as part of its review and approval of the research project for the purpose of protecting personal information held in agency databases:(A) Determine whether the requested personal information is needed to conduct the research.(B) Permit access to personal information only if it is needed for the research project.(C) Permit access only to the minimum necessary personal information needed for the research project.(D) Require the assignment of unique subject codes that are not derived from personal information in lieu of social security numbers if the research can still be conducted without social security numbers.(E) If feasible, and if cost, time, and technical expertise permit, require the agency to conduct a portion of the data processing for the researcher to minimize the release of personal information.(4) Reasonable costs to the agency associated with the agency’s process of protecting personal information under the conditions of CPHS approval may be billed to the researcher, including, but not limited to, the agency’s costs for conducting a portion of the data processing for the researcher, removing personal information, encrypting or otherwise securing personal information, or assigning subject codes.(5) The CPHS may enter into written agreements to enable other institutional review boards to provide the data security approvals required by this subdivision, if the data security requirements set forth in this subdivision are satisfied.(6) Pursuant to paragraph (5), the CPHS shall enter into a written agreement with the institutional review board established pursuant to former Section 49079.6 of the Education Code. The agreement shall authorize, commencing July 1, 2010, or the date upon which the written agreement is executed, whichever is later, that board to provide the data security approvals required by this subdivision, if the data security requirements set forth in this subdivision and the act specified in subdivision (a) of Section 49079.5 of the Education Code are satisfied.(v) To an insurer if authorized by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 10900) of Division 4 of the Vehicle Code.(w) Pursuant to Section 450, 452, 8009, or 18396 of the Financial Code.(x) For the sole purpose of participation in interstate data sharing of prescription drug monitoring program information pursuant to the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code), if disclosure is limited to prescription drug monitoring program information.This article does not require the disclosure of personal information to the individual to whom the information pertains if that information may otherwise be withheld as set forth in Section 1798.40.SEC. 2. Section 102620 is added to the Health and Safety Code, immediately preceding Section 102625, to read:102620. For the purposes of this article, “original birth certificate” means the birth certificate issued at a live birth of an individual pursuant to Section 102100 that has been sealed pursuant to Section 102685 and supplanted pursuant to Section 102680.SEC. 3. Section 102645 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:102645. The new birth certificate shall bear the name of the adopted person as shown in the report of adoption, the names and ages of their adopting parents, and the date and actual place of birth, and no reference shall be made in the new birth certificate to the adoption of the adopted person. The new certificate shall be identical with a birth certificate registered for the birth of a child of natural parents.SEC. 4. Section 102675 of the Health and Safety Code is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 102685 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:102685. When a new birth certificate is established under this article, the State Registrar shall inform the local registrar and the county recorder whose records contain copies of the original birth certificate, who shall forward the copies to the State Registrar for filing with the original birth certificate, if it is practical for them to do so. If it is impractical for them to forward the copy to the State Registrar, they shall effectually seal a cover over the copy in a manner as not to deface or destroy the copy and forward a verified statement of their action to the State Registrar. Thereafter the information contained in the record shall be available only as provided in this article.SEC. 6. Section 102705 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:102705. (a) All records and information specified in this article, other than the newly issued birth certificate, shall be available only upon the order of the superior court of the county of residence of the adopted child or the superior court of the county granting the order of adoption.(b) No such order shall be granted by the superior court unless a verified petition setting forth facts showing the necessity of the order has been presented to the court and good and compelling cause is shown for the granting of the order. The clerk of the superior court shall send a copy of the petition to the State Department of Social Services and the department shall send a copy of all records and information it has concerning the adopted person with the name and address of the natural parents removed to the court. The court must review these records before making an order and the order should so state. If the petition is by or on behalf of an adopted child who has attained majority, these facts shall be given great weight, but the granting of any petition is solely within the sound discretion of the court.(c) The name and address of the natural parents shall be given to the petitioner only if they can demonstrate that the name and address, or either of them, are necessary to assist them in establishing a legal right.(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2028, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.SEC. 7. Section 102705 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:102705. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Registrar shall provide to an adopted person who is 18 years of age or older and who was born in this state, or to a person 18 years of age or older who is a descendant, as defined in Section 6205 of the Probate Code, of a deceased adopted person who was born in this state, a copy of the adopted person’s original birth certificate, as defined in Section 102620, previously filed with the State Registrar.(2) To receive a copy of an original birth certificate pursuant to this section, the adopted person, or a descendant, as defined in Section 6205 of the Probate Code, of a deceased adopted person, shall make the request to the State Registrar. A copy of the original birth certificate shall clearly indicate that it may not be used for identification purposes.(3) All procedures, fees, and waiting periods pursuant to Sections 103525 to 103590, inclusive, and applicable to a nonadopted person’s request for a copy of a birth certificate, shall apply to requests made pursuant to this section.(4) If a contact preference form is attached to an original birth certificate as provided in Section 102706, the State Registrar shall provide a copy of the contact preference form at the time the original birth certificate is produced to the adopted person or the descendant.(b) Except as otherwise provided for in subdivision (a), all records and information specified in this article, other than the newly issued birth certificate, shall be available only upon the order of the superior court of the county granting the order of adoption, and only after good cause is shown for the granting of the order.(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 8. Section 102706 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:102706. (a) (1) The State Registrar shall make available to the public, on or before July 1, 2028, a contact preference form as described in this section. The(2) The contact preference form shall include the following selections to be completed at the option of the birth parent:(1)(A) “I would like to be contacted.”(2)(B) “I would prefer to be contacted only through an intermediary.”(3)(C) “I would prefer not to be contacted at this time. If I decide at a later time that I would like to be contacted, I will submit an updated contact preference form to the State Department of Public Health.”(3) The contact preference form shall also include an additional blank space for the birth parent to provide any additional information they choose.(b) If a birth parent of an adopted person submits a completed contact preference form to the State Registrar, the State Registrar shall do the following:(1) Match the contact preference form to the adopted person’s original birth certificate.(2) Attach the contact preference form to the original birth certificate.(3) Replace any previously filed contact preference form with a newly completed contact preference form. (c) A contact preference form submitted to the State Registrar pursuant to this section is a confidential communication between the birth parent and the adopted person or descendant, as defined in Section 6205 of the Probate Code, of a deceased adopted person and, notwithstanding any other law, may only be released as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 102705.(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Registrar shall announce and publicize the availability of the contact preference form utilizing a means of communication appropriate to inform the public effectively.